Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 65. Actions, Immunities, Defenses, and Duties.

Cross references. —

For limitations on liability of certain volunteer guardians ad litem, see AS

44.21.450

; for civil damages, see AS 09.17.

Secs. 09.65.010 — 09.65.012.
Officers authorized to administer oath or affirmation; certification of documents. [Repealed, § 6 ch 37 SLA 1981. For present provisions, see AS 09.63.]

Secs. 09.65.020 — 09.65.040.
[Renumbered as AS 09.68.020 — 09.68.040.]

Sec. 09.65.050.
[Renumbered as AS 09.15.040.]

Sec. 09.65.060.
[Renumbered as AS 09.68.060.]

Sec. 09.65.070.
Suits against incorporated units of local government.

Except as provided in this section, an action may be maintained against a municipality in its corporate character and within the scope of its authority.

A municipality may not require a person to post bond as a condition to bringing a cause of action against it.

An action may not be maintained against an employee or member of a fire department operated and maintained by a municipality or village if the claim is an action for tort or breach of a contractual duty and is based upon the act or omission of the employee or member of the fire department in the execution of a function for which the department is established.

An action for damages may not be brought against a municipality or any of its agents, officers, or employees if the claim

is based on a failure of the municipality, or its agents, officers, or employees, when the municipality is neither owner nor lessee of the property involved,

to inspect property for a violation of any statute, regulation, or ordinance, or a hazard to health or safety;

to discover a violation of any statute, regulation, or ordinance, or a hazard to health or safety if an inspection of property is made; or

to abate a violation of any statute, regulation, or ordinance, or a hazard to health or safety discovered on property inspected;

is based upon the exercise or performance or the failure to exercise or perform a discretionary function or duty by a municipality or its agents, officers, or employees, whether or not the discretion involved is abused;

is based upon the grant, issuance, refusal, suspension, delay, or denial of a license, permit, appeal, approval, exception, variance, or other entitlement, or a rezoning;

is based on the exercise or performance during the course of gratuitous extension of municipal services on an extraterritorial basis;

is based upon the exercise or performance of a duty or function upon the request of, or by the terms of an agreement or contract with, the state to meet emergency public safety requirements; or

is based on the exercise or performance of a duty in connection with an enhanced 911 emergency system and is not based on an intentional act of misconduct or on an act of gross negligence.

In this section

“municipality” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

and includes a public corporation established by a municipality;

“village” means an unincorporated community where at least 25 people reside as a social unit.

History.

(§ 5.13 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 215 SLA 1975; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 37 SLA 1977; am § 24 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, in (c), “An action may not” was substituted for “No action may” and in (d) “An action for damages may not” was substituted for “No action for damages may” in order to conform the statute to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 09.65.080.
Suits by incorporated units of local government.

An action may be maintained by an incorporated borough, city, or other public corporation of like character in its corporate name, and upon a cause of action accruing to it in its corporate character

upon a contract made with the public corporation;

upon a liability prescribed by law in favor of the public corporation;

to recover a penalty or forfeiture given to the public corporation;

to recover damages for an injury to the corporate rights or property of the public corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 23 SLA 1964)

Sec. 09.65.083.
Civil liability of nonprofit and university fire departments.

An action for tort or breach of a contractual duty based on the act or omission of an employee or member of a nonprofit or university fire department in the execution of a function for which the department is established may not be maintained against an employee or member of the nonprofit or university fire department.

An action for tort or breach of a contractual duty based on the act or omission of an employee or member of a nonprofit or university fire department in the execution of a function for which the department is established may not be maintained against the nonprofit or university fire department unless the action

alleges intentional misconduct or gross negligence; or

is based on the act or omission of an employee or member of the nonprofit or university fire department in the execution of a duty under contract with a private entity.

The immunity afforded by this section is in addition to any immunity under other law.

This section does not limit the authority of a municipality or village to maintain an action against a contractor, vendor, or supplier providing services or goods to the municipality or village.

In this section,

“nonprofit or university fire department” means a fire department registered with the state fire marshal that is

operated and maintained by a university; or

a nonprofit that provides services under contract or agreement with a municipality or village;

“village” means an unincorporated community where at least 25 people reside as a social unit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to immunity for an employee or member of a fire department operated or maintained by a municipality or village, see AS

09.65.070(c)

.

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 15, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect August 9, 2015.

Sec. 09.65.085.
Civil liability of electric utility.

A utility offering electrical service to the public for compensation under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska under AS

42.05.221

may not be held strictly liable for property damage, death, or personal injury resulting from an act or omission of the utility relating to the production, delivery, or sale of electricity.

This section does not preclude liability for civil damages that are the result of an intentional, reckless, or negligent act or omission.

History.

(§ 29 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (a) “former Alaska Public Utilities Commission or the Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(b), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.65.087.
Civil liability for use of an automated external defibrillator.

A person who uses or attempts to use an automated external defibrillator device on a victim of a perceived medical emergency is not liable for civil damages resulting from the use or attempted use of the device. This subsection does not apply to civil damages resulting from a failure to notify the appropriate emergency medical services agency.

A person who acquires or provides an automated external defibrillator device for use on a victim of a perceived medical emergency is not liable for civil damages resulting from the use or attempted use of the device. This subsection does not apply to civil damages resulting from gross negligence.

The immunity provided by (b) of this section does not apply to a manufacturer of an automated external defibrillator.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 19 SLA 2015.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2 ch 19 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective August 12, 2015, in (b), substituted “gross negligence” for “the failure of the person who acquires or provides the device to (1) notify the local emergency medical response authority or other appropriate entity of the most recent placement of the device within 30 days following placement of the device; (2) properly maintain and test the device; (3) provide, within a reasonable proximity to the device’s usual location, a means of notifying the local emergency medical response authority that an emergency occurs where the device is used; or (4) provide appropriate training in the use of the device to an employee or agent of the person who acquires or provides the device; however, this paragraph does not apply and immunity is provided under this subsection if the period of time elapsing between hiring the person as an employee or agent and the occurrence of the harm, or between the acquisition of the device and the occurrence of the harm in any case in which the device was acquired after hiring the employee or agent, was not in excess of six months”; repealed (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 120, SLA 2003, provides that this section “applies to a civil action that accrues on or after July 1, 2003.”

Sec. 09.65.090.
Civil liability for emergency aid.

A person at a hospital or any other location who renders emergency care or emergency counseling to an injured, ill, or emotionally distraught person who reasonably appears to the person rendering the aid to be in immediate need of emergency aid in order to avoid serious harm or death is not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission in rendering emergency aid.

A member of an organization that exists for the purpose of providing emergency services is not liable for civil damages for injury to a person that results from an act or omission in providing first aid, search, rescue, or other emergency services to the person, regardless of whether the member is under a preexisting duty to render assistance, if the member provided the service while acting as a volunteer member of the organization; in this subsection, “volunteer” means a person who is paid not more than $10 a day and a total of not more than $500 a year, not including ski lift tickets and reimbursement for expenses actually incurred, for providing emergency services.

The immunity provided under (b) of this section does not apply to civil damages that result from providing or attempting to provide any of the following advanced life support techniques unless the person who provided them was authorized by law to provide them:

manual electric cardiac defibrillation;

administration of antiarrhythmic agents;

intravenous therapy;

intramuscular therapy; or

use of endotracheal intubation devices.

This section does not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 92 SLA 2003.]

[Repealed, § 2 ch 92 SLA 2003.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1971; am § 38 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 32 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 120 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (b) and (c) were enacted as (c) and (d), respectively.
Renumbered in 1988, at which time former subsection (b) was renumbered as (d). In 1994, in subsection (b), “subsection” was substituted for “paragraph” to correct a manifest error in ch. 90, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For immunity from liability for emergency medical services, see AS

18.08.086

.

For a statement of the purpose of the 1998 amendment to paragraph (c)(1) and addition of subsections (e) and (f), see § 1, ch. 32, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For emergency medical technicians, emergency medical technician instructors, see 7 AAC 26, art. 1.

For manual defibrillator technicians and approved training courses, see 7 AAC 26, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 120, SLA 2003, provides that the repeal of (e) and (f) of this section “applies to a civil action that accrues on or after July 1, 2003.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Department of Natural Resources firefighters probably have a duty to rescue that removes them from the protection of this section. Thus, the state is liable through them for any negligence in the performance of that duty. May 22, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.65.091.
Civil liability for responding to disaster.

A person who provides equipment or services on the request of a police agency, fire department, rescue or emergency squad, or other governmental agency during a state of emergency declared by an authorized representative of the state or local government is not liable for the death of or injury to any person or damage to any property caused by that person’s actions, except when the trier of facts finds that the person acted intentionally, recklessly, or with gross negligence.

This section does not affect the right of a person to receive benefits to which the person would otherwise be entitled under the workers’ compensation law or under any pension law, nor does it affect entitlement to any other benefits or compensation authorized by state or federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 4 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision providing that during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared March 11, 2020, a health care provider or manufacturer of personal protective equipment is not liable for civil damages resulting from an act or omission in issuing, providing, or manufacturing personal protective equipment in the event of injury or death to the user of the personal protective equipment if the personal protective equipment was issued, provided, or manufactured in good faith to respond to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency, see § 32, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 09.65.092.
Civil liability for voluntary aircraft safety inspection.

An aircraft or power plant technician or mechanic certified by the Federal Aviation Administration who participates without compensation in a voluntary aircraft safety inspection program is not liable for civil damage resulting from an act or omission arising out of an aircraft safety inspection in that program unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 3 SLA 1982)

Sec. 09.65.093.
Civil liability relating to aircraft runways, airfields, and landing areas.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a person who without compensation owns, operates, constructs, maintains, or repairs an aircraft runway, airfield, or landing area may not be held civilly liable, except for an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or recklessness or intentional misconduct, for the injury to or death of a person or for damage to an aircraft, resulting from the use of the runway, airfield, or landing area to take off, land, park, or operate an aircraft.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 3 SLA 2008.]

The immunity from civil liability under (a) of this section does not limit the liability of an owner or operator of an aircraft runway, airfield, or landing area to a provider of flight services or its passengers under contract with the owner or operator.

History.

(§ 12 ch 56 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 39 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 3 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 16, ch. 56, SLA 2001 provides that this section “applies to a civil action that accrues on or after September 27, 2001.”

Sec. 09.65.094.
Liability for inspection, installation, or adjustment of a child safety seat.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person other than a manufacturer of child safety seats or an agent or employee of a manufacturer of child safety seats is not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission that occurs in the inspection, installation, or adjustment of a child safety seat or in providing education regarding the installation or adjustment of a child safety seat if

the person

has successfully completed the National Child Passenger Safety Certification Training Program and maintains a current child passenger safety technician or technician instructor certification issued under that program;

offers or arranges a nonprofit child safety seat educational program, checkup event, or checking station program for the public with instruction by certified child passenger safety technicians or technician instructors; or

owns property where a nonprofit child safety seat educational program, checkup event, or checking station program for the public occurs with instruction by certified child passenger safety technicians or technician instructors; and

the services are provided

without a fee, other than for the reimbursement of actual expenses;

in good faith; and

within the scope of training for which the person is currently certified.

This section does not apply to a civil action

for damages resulting from gross negligence or wilful or wanton misconduct; or

where the inspection, installation, or adjustment of a child safety seat, or education provided regarding the inspection, installation, or adjustment of a child safety seat, is performed in conjunction with the for-profit sale of a child safety seat.

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 31, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect September 29, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Section 3, ch. 31, SLA 2016, provides that this section "applies to causes of action that accrue on or after September 29, 2016."

Sec. 09.65.095.
Liability for administration of blood test.

A civil or criminal action arising out of battery may not be brought against a health care provider for the act of taking a blood sample if the sample is taken

at the request of a police officer under the circumstances specified in AS

28.35.035

or when the arresting officer has a search warrant or court order authorizing the taking of the blood sample; and

without the use of excessive or unreasonable force.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit recovery of damages incident to the improper or negligent withdrawal of blood.

In this section,

“health care provider” means a nurse licensed under AS 08.68, a physician licensed under AS 08.64, and a person certified by a hospital as competent to take blood samples;

“hospital” means a hospital as defined in AS

47.32.900

, including a governmentally owned or operated hospital.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 117 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A civil or criminal action arising out of battery may not” was substituted for “No civil or criminal action arising out of battery may” in order to conform this section to the currrent style of the Alaska Statutes.

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c) and subsection (c) was enacted as (b); relettered in 2014.

Sec. 09.65.096.
Civil liability of hospitals for certain physicians.

A hospital is not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission by an emergency room physician who is not an employee or actual agent of the hospital if the hospital provides notice that the emergency room physician is an independent contractor and the emergency room physician is insured as described under (c) of this section. The hospital is responsible for exercising reasonable care in granting privileges to practice in the hospital, for reviewing those privileges on a regular basis, and for taking appropriate steps to revoke or restrict privileges in appropriate circumstances. The hospital is not otherwise liable for the acts or omissions of an emergency room physician who is an independent contractor. The notice required by this subsection must (1) be posted conspicuously in all admitting areas of the hospital; (2) consist of a sign at least two feet high and two feet wide, with print at least two inches high; (3) be published at least annually in a newspaper of general circulation in the area; and (4) be in substantially the following form:

This section does not preclude liability for civil damages that are the proximate result of the hospital’s negligence or intentional misconduct.

A hospital is not immune from liability under (a) of this section for an act or omission of an emergency room physician who is an independent contractor unless the emergency room physician has liability insurance coverage in the amount of at least $500,000 for each incident and $1,500,000 for all incidents in a year, and the coverage is in effect and applicable to those health care services offered by the emergency room physician that the hospital is required to provide by law or by accreditation requirements.

In this section,

“emergency room physician” means a physician who does not have an ongoing physician-patient relationship with the emergency room patient and who provides emergency health care services in a hospital emergency room;

“hospital” has the meaning given in AS

47.32.900

and includes a governmentally owned or operated hospital;

“independent contractor” means an emergency room physician who is not an employee or actual agent of the hospital in connection with the rendition of the health care services.

Notice to Hospital Users and
Notice of Limited Liability

(Name of hospital) may not be responsible for the actions of emergency room physicians in (name of hospital’s emergency room). The following emergency room physicians are independent contractors and are not employees of the hospital: (List specific emergency room physicians)

History.

(§ 30 ch 26 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.65.097.
Civil liability for emergency veterinary care.

A veterinarian licensed in this or another licensing jurisdiction, or a person working under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian, who renders emergency care to an injured or ill animal that reasonably appears to the veterinarian or supervised person to be in immediate need of emergency aid in order to avoid serious harm or death is not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission in rendering emergency aid.

This section does not apply to service rendered at the request of an owner of the animal and does not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1986)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 18, SLA 1986 makes this section applicable to all causes of action for damages that “have not been filed in a court of this state before July 1, 1986.”

Sec. 09.65.100.
[Renumbered as AS 25.20.025.]

Secs. 09.65.110 — 09.65.120.

[Renumbered as AS 09.68.110 — 09.68.120.]

.

Sec. 09.65.112.
Civil liability for aircraft and watercraft guest passengers.

An owner or operator of an aircraft or watercraft is not liable for the civil damages of a person being transported in the owner’s or operator’s aircraft or watercraft if the aircraft or watercraft is not being used for commercial purposes.

This section does not apply to a civil action

for damages resulting from

gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct;

an act or omission of an owner or operator of an aircraft or watercraft if the aircraft or watercraft is being operated as a common carrier; or

an act or omission of an owner or operator of an aircraft or watercraft that occurs while demonstrating an aircraft or watercraft to a prospective buyer; or

described under (a) of this section if the owner or operator

has insurance that would compensate the claimant for civil damages awarded against the owner or operator; an owner or operator who is insured as described in this subparagraph is not liable for civil damages described in (a) of this section that exceed the applicable insurance; or

does not have insurance that would compensate a person being transported as described under (a) of this section for civil damages awarded against the owner or operator and, before the person being transported enters the aircraft or watercraft, the owner or operator fails to provide notice to the person being transported that the owner or operator is uninsured as described in this subparagraph.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 2003)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 119, SLA 2003, provides that this section “applies to causes of action that accrue on or after” July 1, 2003.

Sec. 09.65.130.
[Renumbered as AS 25.24.310.]

Sec. 09.65.132.
[Renumbered as AS 25.27.062.]

Sec. 09.65.135.
Limitations on claims arising from skiing. [Repealed, § 3 ch 63 SLA 1994. For current law, see AS 05.45.]

Sec. 09.65.145.
Liability for injuries or death resulting from livestock activities.

Livestock are unpredictable and inherently dangerous. All persons who knowingly place themselves in proximity to livestock for any reason involving an activity that includes livestock subject themselves to serious injury or death and are considered a participant in livestock activity and assume the risk of injury or death caused by the livestock.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person, and the personal representative of a person, who suffers an injury or death resulting from a livestock activity may not recover civil damages for the injury or death from a livestock activity sponsor, livestock professional, or livestock activity participant, or the agents or employees of a livestock activity sponsor, livestock professional, or livestock activity participant.

This section does not affect a civil action for damages resulting from

gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct of the livestock activity sponsor, livestock professional, or livestock activity participant, or agents or employees of the livestock activity sponsor, livestock professional, or livestock activity participant;

equipment, tack, or a product provided by the livestock activity sponsor, livestock professional, or livestock activity participant that the livestock activity sponsor, livestock professional, or livestock activity participant knows is faulty or defective;

the failure of the livestock activity sponsor, livestock professional, or livestock activity participant who provided the livestock to make a reasonable and prudent effort to determine the ability of the participant to safely manage the livestock activity, after taking into account the participant’s representation of ability; a participant in a livestock show, livestock sale, or rodeo is presumed to be competent to handle livestock if an entry form is required for the activity and is signed or submitted by the participant.

This section does not nullify coverage or an award for an injury to or death of an employee of a livestock activity sponsor or livestock professional if the employee suffers an injury or death resulting from a livestock activity and the injury or death is covered by or subject to workers’ compensation provisions under AS 23.30.

This section does not prevent or limit the liability of a livestock activity sponsor, livestock professional, or livestock activity participant, or their agents or employees under a liability provision as provided in a law relating to product liability.

A livestock activity sponsor may not be held vicariously liable for the acts or omissions of a livestock activity participant or a livestock professional.

A person may agree, in writing, to waive the entire right to recover damages resulting from an inherent risk of a livestock activity.

This section does not affect the immunity of an owner of unimproved land under AS

09.65.200

.

In this section,

“inherent risk of a livestock activity” means those dangers or conditions that are an integral part of a livestock activity, including

the propensity of livestock to behave in ways that may result in injury to a person on or around livestock;

the unpredictability of livestock’s reaction to sound, sudden movement, and unfamiliar objects or persons, or other animals;

hazards or conditions unknown to a livestock activity sponsor;

collisions with other livestock or objects;

the potential of tack to become dislodged or move in ways that may result in injury to a person on or around a livestock activity; and

the potential of a person to negligently engage in conduct that contributes to an injury or death during a livestock activity;

“livestock” includes a domestic cow, domestic bison, hog, sheep, goat, domestic musk ox, yak, pig, legally possessed caribou, reindeer, domestic elk, rabbit, hamster, guinea pig, turkey, chicken, pheasant, peafowl, pigeon, horse, mule, donkey, camel, llama, alpaca, or a waterfowl that does not require a federal permit; “livestock” does not mean a dog or cat;

“livestock activity” includes

livestock shows, fairs, sales, competitions, or performances that involve any or all breeds of livestock and any of the livestock disciplines, including rodeos, auctions, driving, pulling, judging, cutting, therapeutic riding, and showing;

livestock training or teaching activities or both training and teaching activities;

boarding or pasturing livestock;

testing, inspecting, or evaluating livestock belonging to another person, whether or not the owner has received monetary consideration or other thing of value for the use of the livestock or is permitting a prospective purchaser of the livestock to inspect or evaluate the livestock;

driving, riding, grooming, traveling, or other livestock activities of any type, however informal or impromptu, that are sponsored by a livestock activity sponsor;

placing or replacing horseshoes on an equine, or otherwise preparing livestock for show; and

assisting in providing medical treatment to livestock;

“livestock activity sponsor” means an individual, group, club, partnership, limited liability company, nonprofit corporation, or corporation operating for profit that sponsors, organizes, or provides the livestock, equipment, tack, facilities, or instruction for a livestock activity;

“livestock professional” means a person who receives compensation for instructing a participant, renting livestock to a participant for the purpose of engaging in livestock activity, or renting equipment or tack to a participant;

“participant” means a person, whether amateur or professional, who engages in a livestock activity or who is near or close to livestock, whether or not a fee is paid to participate in the livestock activity.

History.

(§ 3 ch 122 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative findings and intent relating to this section, see § 1, ch. 122, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4,
ch. 122, SLA 2003, provides that this section “applies to a civil action that accrues on or after September 16, 2003.”

Sec. 09.65.150.
Duty to disabled pedestrians.

The driver of a vehicle approaching a physically disabled pedestrian who is carrying a white or metallic-colored cane, or using special equipment for mobility, or using a service animal, shall take precautions necessary to avoid injury to the pedestrian or the service animal. A driver who fails to take necessary precautions and, as a result, causes injury to the pedestrian or the service animal, or causes property damage, is liable for the injury or damage caused.

In this section,

“physically disabled pedestrian” means a person who has a physical condition that limits the person’s ability to function as a pedestrian without the assistance of another person, a service animal, a cane, or other equipment or device;

“service animal” means a dog guide or other animal that assists a physically disabled person to function as a pedestrian.

History.

(§ 2 ch 69 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1988)

Sec. 09.65.155.
Civil liability of firearms or ammunition manufacturer or dealer.

A civil action to recover damages or to seek injunctive relief may not be brought against a person who manufactures or sells firearms or ammunition if the action is based on the lawful sale, manufacture, or design of firearms or ammunition. However, this section does not prohibit a civil action resulting from a negligent design, a manufacturing defect, a breach of contract, or a breach of warranty.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 1999)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 17, SLA 1999 provides that this section “applies to a civil action that accrues on or after August 9, 1999.”

Sec. 09.65.160.
Immunity for good faith disclosures of job performance information.

An employer who discloses information about the job performance of an employee or former employee to a prospective employer of the employee or former employee at the request of the prospective employer or the employee or former employee is presumed to be acting in good faith and, unless lack of good faith is shown by a preponderance of the evidence, may not be held liable for the disclosure or its consequences. For purposes of this section, the presumption of good faith is rebutted upon a showing that the employer or former employer

recklessly, knowingly, or with a malicious purpose disclosed false or deliberately misleading information; or

disclosed information in violation of a civil right of the employee or former employee that is protected under AS 18.80 or under comparable federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1993)

Sec. 09.65.161.
Immunity for disclosure of required health care data.

A person who reports health care data required to be reported under AS 18.05 and regulations adopted under that chapter for conditions or diseases of public health importance may not be held liable for the disclosure to the Department of Health and Social Services or for the use of the data by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 46 SLA 1997; am § 5 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Sec. 09.65.170.
Limited liability of certain directors and officers.

Unless the act or omission constituted gross negligence, a person may not recover tort damages for personal injury, death, or damage to property for an act or omission to act in the course and scope of official duties, from one of the following:

a member of the board of directors or an officer of a nonprofit corporation;

a member of the board of directors of a public or nonprofit hospital, or a member of a citizen’s advisory board of any hospital;

a member of a school board of a school district;

a member of the governing body, a commission, or a citizen’s advisory committee of a municipality of the state;

a member of the board of directors, an officer, or an employee of a regional development organization.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the duties and liabilities of a director or officer of a nonprofit corporation to the corporation or the corporation’s shareholders may not be limited or modified.

In this section,

“nonprofit corporation” means a corporation that qualifies for exemption from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or (4) (Internal Revenue Code);

“regional development organization” means a nonprofit organization or nonprofit corporation formed to encourage economic development within a particular region of the state that includes the entire area of each municipality within that region and that has a board of directors that represents the region’s economic, political, and social interests.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 68 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 93 § 2 (1996); am § 2 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 13 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.17.050

. Renumbered in 1994.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 139, SLA 1986 provides that this section applies “to all causes of action accruing after June 11, 1986.”

Sec. 09.65.180.
Civil liability of zoos.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who owns or operates a zoo is strictly liable for injury to a person or property if the injury is caused by an animal owned by or in the custody of the zoo.

A person who owns or operates a zoo is not strictly liable as provided in (a) of this section if

the animal that caused the injury was within the animal’s normal place of confinement at the time the injury occurred;

the zoo owner or operator had posted signs at prominent places within the zoo, including at each entrance, warning that the liability of the zoo for injuries caused by animals within their normal place of confinement is limited by law; and

the enclosure within which the animal was confined at the time of the injury was constructed and maintained in a manner that prevents a person who exercises ordinary care customary for a person of similar age, intelligence, and experience from contacting the animal or entering the enclosure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 101 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.17.100

. Renumbered in 1994.

Sec. 09.65.200.
Tort immunity for personal injuries or death occurring on unimproved land.

An owner of unimproved land is not liable in tort, except for an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct, for damages for the injury to or death of a person who enters onto or remains on the unimproved portion of land if

the injury or death resulted from a natural condition of the unimproved portion of the land or the person entered onto the land for recreation; and

the person had no responsibility to compensate the owner for the person’s use or occupancy of the land.

This section does not enhance or diminish rights granted under former 43 U.S.C. 932 (R.S. 2477).

In this section, “unimproved land” includes land that contains

a trail;

an abandoned aircraft landing area; or

a road built to provide access for natural resource extraction, but which is no longer maintained or used.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 3 ch 168 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.45.795

. Renumbered in 1994.